fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON -o
-o/:o/ -h "weight: 15.842216" ; ! n=33/1379 [15/145429]
-o/:o/ -hkwâmi "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -ht2 "weight: 17.569437" ; ! n=8/1379 [11/145429]
-o/:o/ -ikâkan "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1379 [1/145429]
-o/:o/ -ikê1 "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -is "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -kwât "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/1379 [2/145429]
-o/:o/ -mak- "weight: 19.338724" ; ! n=5/1379 [3/145429]
-o/:o/ -makan "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=4/1379 [3/145429]
-o/:o/ -min "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -n1 "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=5/1379 [1/145429]
-o/:o/ -n3 "weight: 11.951221" ; ! n=131/1379 [185/145429]
-o/:o/ -naw "weight: 21.434870" ; ! n=2/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -nâkosi "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -nâkwan "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -nân "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=2/1379 [4/145429]
-o/:o/ -paýi "weight: 18.788677" ; ! n=13/1379 [2/145429]
-o/:o/ -paýiho "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -s2 "weight: 21.029405" ; ! n=3/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -si "weight: 18.868720" ; ! n=12/1379 [2/145429]
-o/:o/ -sk1 "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -sk3 "weight: 20.182107" ; ! n=7/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -skaw1 "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=4/1379 [3/145429]
-o/:o/ -ski "weight: 21.434870" ; ! n=2/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -ski1 "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -st "weight: 19.730122" ; ! n=11/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -staw "weight: 13.311249" ; ! n=20/1379 [311/145429]
-o/:o/ -t "weight: 21.434870" ; ! n=2/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -tot "weight: 19.051042" ; ! n=10/1379 [2/145429]
-o/:o/ -tot- "weight: 15.755205" ; ! n=18/1379 [30/145429]
-o/:o/ -totaw "weight: 17.652325" ; ! n=9/1379 [9/145429]
-o/:o/ -w "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -w1 "weight: 17.664747" ; ! n=8/1379 [10/145429]
-o/:o/ -w2 "weight: 16.591453" ; ! n=18/1379 [13/145429]
-o/:o/ -waT "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -win "weight: 9.392940" ; ! n=253/1379 [1237/145429]
-o/:o/ -âkan2 "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=3/1379 [3/145429]
-o/:o/ -âkon- "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ -âkê "weight: 18.154954" ; ! n=7/1379 [7/145429]
-o/:o/ -ý "weight: 21.029405" ; ! n=3/1379 [0/145429]
-o+Der/N:o NI "weight: 20.518579" ; ! n=5/1379 (NI-1) [0/145429]
@R.class.AI@-o+Der/V:@R.class.AI@o VAI-io "weight: 7.881059" ; ! n=703/1379 (VAI-1) [2019/145429]
@R.class.AI@-o+Der/V:@R.class.AI@o VAI-io-PL "weight: 19.156402" ; ! n=9/1379 (VAI-1) [2/145429]
@R.class.AI@-o+Der/V:@R.class.AI@o VAI-m "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 (VAI-3) [0/145429]
@R.class.TA@-o+Der/V:@R.class.TA@o VTA "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 (VTA-1) [0/145429]
@R.class.TI@-o+Der/V:@R.class.TI@o VTI-m "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 (VAI-4) [0/145429]
-o/:o/ ast- "weight: 21.029405" ; ! n=3/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ astê- "weight: 21.029405" ; ! n=3/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ iýiniw- "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ kispiso- "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ make "weight: 19.002251" ; ! n=1/1379 [21/145429]
-o/:o/ nikamo- "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ ocêpihkw- "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ pimiy- "weight: 22.128017" ; ! n=1/1379 [0/145429]
-o/:o/ w "weight: 15.105584" ; ! n=22/1379 [47/145429]
-o/:o/ wi "weight: 16.042887" ; ! n=15/1379 [27/145429]
-o/:o/ wêp- "weight: 21.029405" ; ! n=3/1379 [0/145429]

LEXICON -oT
-oT/:oT/ -aw1 "weight: 28.622779" ; ! n=2/5 [0/145429]
-oT/:oT/ -iwê "weight: 28.622779" ; ! n=2/5 [0/145429]
@R.class.TA@-oT+Der/V:@R.class.TA@oT VTA-t "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/5 (VTA-4) [3/145429]

LEXICON -oT-
-oT-+Der/N:oT NI "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=1/2 (NI-1) [5/145429]
@R.class.II@-oT-+Der/V:@R.class.II@oT VII-v-SG "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/2 (NI-5) [0/145429]

LEXICON -ocâpân-
@R.noun.DepNonKin@-ocâpân-+Der/N:@R.noun.DepNonKin@ocâpân NAD "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 (NDA-1) [1/145429]

LEXICON -ohk-
-ohk-/:ohk/ -aw1 "weight: 17.163972" ; ! n=6/14 [22/145429]
-ohk-/:ohk/ -âT "weight: 17.492897" ; ! n=5/14 [19/145429]
-ohk-/:ohk/ -ât "weight: 17.857119" ; ! n=2/14 [33/145429]
-ohk-/:ohk/ -ê2 "weight: 17.472063" ; ! n=1/14 [97/145429]

LEXICON -ohk1
-ohk1/:ohk/ -amaw "weight: 13.327783" ; ! n=14/17 [437/145429]
@R.class.TI@-ohk1+Der/V:@R.class.TI@ohk VTI-m-PL "weight: 15.766378" ; ! n=3/17 (VTI-1) [178/145429]

LEXICON -ohkaw
-ohkaw/:ohkaw/ -ikê2 "weight: 27.323496" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]
@R.class.TA@-ohkaw+Der/V:@R.class.TA@ohkaw VTA "weight: 18.003723" ; ! n=3/6 (VTA-2) [19/145429]
@R.class.TA@-ohkaw+Der/V:@R.class.TA@ohkaw VTA-PL "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/6 (VTA-2) [3/145429]

LEXICON -ohkom-
-ohkom-/:ohkom/ -i "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/12 [1/145429]
-ohkom-/:ohkom/ -i2 "weight: 18.175573" ; ! n=4/12 [12/145429]
-ohkom-/:ohkom/ -imâw "weight: 20.100864" ; ! n=1/12 [7/145429]
-ohkom-/:ohkom/ -ipan "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/12 [2/145429]
-ohkom-/:ohkom/ -naw "weight: 24.714095" ; ! n=1/12 [0/145429]
-ohkom-+Der/N:ohkom NA "weight: 19.648879" ; ! n=1/12 (NA-2) [11/145429]
@R.noun.DepNonKin@-ohkom-+Der/N:@R.noun.DepNonKin@ohkom NAD "weight: 15.770130" ; ! n=2/12 (NDA-1) [266/145429]
@R.class.TI@-ohkom-+Der/V:@R.class.TI@ohkom VTI-m "weight: 24.714095" ; ! n=1/12 (NDA-1) [0/145429]

LEXICON -ohkomis-
-ohkomis-/:ohkomis/ -i2 "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/3 [0/145429]
-ohkomis-/:ohkomis/ -imâw "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/3 [0/145429]
@R.noun.DepNonKin@-ohkomis-+Der/N:@R.noun.DepNonKin@ohkomis NAD "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/3 (NDA-1) [2/145429]

LEXICON -ohpan-
-ohpan-/:ohpan/ -ahp- "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/5 [0/145429]
-ohpan-/:ohpan/ -ahpinê "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/5 [0/145429]
@R.noun.DepNonKin@-ohpan-+Der/N:@R.noun.DepNonKin@ohpan3 NAD "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 (NDA-1) [0/145429]

LEXICON -oht-
-oht-/:oht/ -ah "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/289 [1/145429]
-oht-/:oht/ -ah3 "weight: 11.496733" ; ! n=73/289 [523/145429]
-oht-/:oht/ -at "weight: 12.652696" ; ! n=61/289 [197/145429]
-oht-/:oht/ -aw1 "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/289 [2/145429]
-oht-/:oht/ -âkan2 "weight: 22.043759" ; ! n=1/289 [0/145429]
-oht-/:oht/ -âkê "weight: 22.043759" ; ! n=1/289 [0/145429]
-oht-/:oht/ -ât "weight: 18.788677" ; ! n=2/289 [13/145429]
-oht-/:oht/ -ê2 "weight: 8.865606" ; ! n=148/289 [3583/145429]

LEXICON -oht1
-oht1/:oht/ -ah3 "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/2 [1/145429]

LEXICON -ohtah
-ohtah/:ohtah/ -iso "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/76 [1/145429]
-ohtah/:ohtah/ -iwê "weight: 14.406651" ; ! n=20/76 [104/145429]
-ohtah/:ohtah/ -âhT "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/76 [1/145429]
@R.class.TA@-ohtah+Der/V:@R.class.TA@ohtah VTA "weight: 12.060049" ; ! n=52/76 (VTA-1) [418/145429]
-ohtah/:ohtah/ iskwêw- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/76 [1/145429]

LEXICON -ohtat
-ohtat/:ohtat/ -amaw "weight: 17.690065" ; ! n=6/23 [13/145429]
-ohtat/:ohtat/ -ikâtê "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/23 [1/145429]
-ohtat/:ohtat/ -ikê1 "weight: 16.699666" ; ! n=14/23 [15/145429]
@R.class.TI@-ohtat+Der/V:@R.class.TI@ohtat VTI-m "weight: 18.409188" ; ! n=2/23 (VTI-1) [19/145429]

LEXICON -ohtatâ
@R.class.TI@-ohtatâ+Der/V:@R.class.TI@ohtatâ VTI-ae "weight: 13.405241" ; ! n=38/38 (VTI-2) [149/145429]

LEXICON -ohtaw
-ohtaw/:ohtaw/ -ikê2 "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]
@R.class.TA@-ohtaw+Der/V:@R.class.TA@ohtaw VTA "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/2 (VTA-2) [2/145429]

LEXICON -ohtâ-
@R.noun.DepNonKin@-ohtâ-+Der/N:@R.noun.DepNonKin@ohtâ NAD "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 (NDA-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON Initials
0 -ocâpân- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [1/145429]
0 -ohkom- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=10/27654 [290/145429]
0 -ohkomis- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [2/145429]
0 -ohpan- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [0/145429]
0 -ohtâ- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
LEXICON iT-
iT-/:iT/ -oht- "weight: 11.906634" ; ! n=20/762 [1267/145429]
iT-/:iT/ -ohtah "weight: 15.683746" ; ! n=4/762 [145/145429]
iT-/:iT/ -ohtat "weight: 17.952429" ; ! n=5/762 [12/145429]
iT-/:iT/ -ohtatâ "weight: 17.952429" ; ! n=3/762 [20/145429]
LEXICON miýw-
miýw-/:miýw/ -oht- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/374 [1/145429]
miýw-/:miýw/ -ohtah "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/374 [1/145429]
LEXICON mêst-
mêst-/:mêst/ -oht- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/142 [3/145429]
LEXICON nîsw-
nîsw-/:nîsw/ -ohk- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/90 [2/145429]
nîsw-/:nîsw/ -ohk1 "weight: 15.032858" ; ! n=8/90 [139/145429]
nîsw-/:nîsw/ -ohkaw "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/90 [2/145429]
nîsw-/:nîsw/ -oht- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/90 [1/145429]
LEXICON o1-
o1-/:o/ -ohkom- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/251 [2/145429]
LEXICON oht-
oht-/:oht/ -oht- "weight: 16.146877" ; ! n=5/149 [73/145429]
oht-/:oht/ -ohtah "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/149 [1/145429]
oht-/:oht/ -ohtatâ "weight: 23.870627" ; ! n=1/149 [0/145429]
LEXICON papâm-
papâm-/:papâm/ -oht- "weight: 15.344814" ; ! n=11/116 [74/145429]
papâm-/:papâm/ -ohtah "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/116 [3/145429]
papâm-/:papâm/ -ohtat "weight: 24.075944" ; ! n=2/116 [0/145429]
papâm-/:papâm/ -ohtatâ "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/116 [1/145429]
LEXICON pim-
pim-/:pim/ -oht- "weight: 12.284216" ; ! n=29/326 [599/145429]
pim-/:pim/ -ohtah "weight: 17.615957" ; ! n=3/326 [28/145429]
pim-/:pim/ -ohtat "weight: 17.482426" ; ! n=3/326 [32/145429]
pim-/:pim/ -ohtatâ "weight: 18.309104" ; ! n=1/326 [42/145429]
LEXICON pêyakw-
pêyakw-/:pêyakw/ -ohk- "weight: 24.776184" ; ! n=1/129 [0/145429]
pêyakw-/:pêyakw/ -ohk1 "weight: 24.776184" ; ! n=1/129 [0/145429]
pêyakw-/:pêyakw/ -ohkaw "weight: 24.776184" ; ! n=1/129 [0/145429]
pêyakw-/:pêyakw/ -oht- "weight: 24.776184" ; ! n=1/129 [0/145429]
LEXICON sâpw-
sâpw-/:sâpw/ -oht- "weight: 17.441604" ; ! n=5/157 [20/145429]
sâpw-/:sâpw/ -ohtah "weight: 25.371113" ; ! n=1/157 [0/145429]
LEXICON wan-
wan-/:wan/ -oht- "weight: 19.274185" ; ! n=4/154 [4/145429]
wan-/:wan/ -ohtah "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=3/154 [3/145429]
LEXICON âht-
âht-/:âht/ -oht- "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/103 [3/145429]
âht-/:âht/ -ohtatâ "weight: 26.425555" ; ! n=1/103 [0/145429]
